Hawaii statutes.
§343-8 Severability. If any provision
of this chapter or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications
of this chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or
application; and to this end, the provisions of this chapter are declared to be
severable. [L 1974, c 246, pt of §1; ren L 1979, c 197, §1(9)]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next